Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.250

Challenge, exception, denial may be oral.

The challenge, the exception, and the denial may be made orally. The judge shall enter the same upon the record, along with the substance of the testimony on either side.

[ 2003 c 406 s 13; Code 1881 s 219; 1877 p 45 s 223; 1869 p 54 s 223; RRS s 337.]